Hawaii, session 2025, SB1094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that noise pollution is a serious problem affecting quality of life, particularly in urban areas.  Ambulance and emergency vehicle sirens, which operate at all times of the day, exceed the eighty decibel measurement at which damage can occur to the human ear and continue to be a cause for concern in communities throughout the State.  The legislature finds that traditional "wail sirens" sirens, and dual frequency, or "high-low sirens", reach the same decibel and are equally audible to anyone in the immediate area.  However, the lower pitch of dual frequency sirens delivers a less piercing noise, which travels more effectively through the immediate area, but is not as audible at longer distances. This effectively reduces noise pollution and negative mental health effects, especially in urban areas. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require that any motor vehicle permitted to be equipped with sirens purchased or contracted in the State be equipped with dual frequency sirens. SECTION 2. Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321-    Motor vehicle sirens.  (a)  Beginning January 1, 2026, every new motor vehicle permitted by law to be equipped with a siren, whether purchased or contracted, shall be equipped with a dual frequency siren. (b)  For the purposes of this section "dual frequency siren" means a pneumatic two-tone siren that consists of two sets of air horns, one high pitched and one low pitched, or similar technology." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________